Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 1 Cruelty to Animals

4-1-1.
Definitions — Responsibility for agents and employees.

In this chapter and in §§

4-4-9

,

4-4-10

, and

23-19-8

:

“Animal” and “animals” means every living creature except a human being.

“Licensed graduate veterinarian” or “veterinarian” means a person licensed to engage in the practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry in this state who is a graduate of an accredited veterinary medical, surgical, and dental school or college of a standard recognized by the Rhode Island Veterinary Medical Association.

“Owner,” “person,” and “whoever” means corporations as well as individuals.

“Guardian” shall mean a person(s) having the same rights and responsibilities of an owner, and both terms shall be used interchangeably. A guardian shall also mean a person who possesses, has title to or an interest in, harbors, or has control, custody, or possession of an animal and who is responsible for an animal’s safety and well-being.

Except for livestock as defined in §

4-26-3(6)

, “adequate living conditions” shall mean a sanitary environment that is dry and free of accumulated feces and free of debris and garbage that may clutter the environment, pose a danger, or entangle the animal. The environment in which the animal is kept must be consistent with federal regulatory requirements, where applicable, or generally recognized professional standards, where applicable, or otherwise be of sufficient size so as not to inhibit comfortable rest, normal posture, or range of movement, and suitable to maintain the animal in a good state of health. “Adequate living conditions” for livestock as defined in §

4-26-3(6)

shall mean best management practices established, no later than July 1, 2014, by the Rhode Island livestock welfare and care standards advisory council.

Except for livestock as defined in §

4-26-3

, “hazardous accumulation of animals” means the accumulation of a large number of animals, to a point where the owner, possessor, or person having the charge of custody of the aforementioned animals fails to or is unable to provide “adequate living conditions” as defined herein, resulting in harm or danger to the health and wellbeing of the animals.

The knowledge and acts of agents of and persons employed by corporations in regard to animals transported, owned or employed by or in the custody of that corporation are held to be the acts and knowledge of that corporation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 7; P.L. 1945, ch. 1651, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-1

; P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 444, § 1.

4-1-2.
Overwork, mistreatment, or failure to feed animals — Shelter defined.

Whoever overdrives, overloads, drives when overloaded, overworks, tortures, torments, deprives of necessary sustenance, cruelly beats, mutilates, or cruelly kills, or causes or procures to be so overdriven, overloaded, driven when overloaded, overworked, tortured, tormented, deprived of necessary sustenance, cruelly beaten, or mutilated, any animal, and whoever, having the charge or custody of any animal, either as owner or otherwise, inflicts cruelty upon that animal, or willfully fails to provide that animal with proper food, drink, shelter, or protection from the weather, shall, for each offense, be imprisoned not exceeding eleven (11) months, or be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or both. If the offense described in this section results in the death of the animal, the person shall be punished in the manner provided in §

4-1-5

.

Any person who has been previously convicted of an offense provided for in chapter 1 of title 4 shall, upon conviction of a second or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10) period, be imprisoned for a period not exceeding six (6) years, or fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both. In addition, every person convicted under chapter 1 of title 4 of a second or subsequent offense shall be required to serve one hundred (100) hours of community restitution. The community restitution penalty shall not be suspended or deferred and is mandatory.

Every owner, possessor, or person having charge of any animal may, upon conviction of a violation of this section, be ordered to forfeit all rights to ownership of the animal to the animal-control officer of the city or town in which the offense occurred or to a humane society that owns and operates the shelter that provided the subject animal shelter subsequent to any confiscation of that animal pursuant to this section.

Shelter means a structure used to house any animal that will provide sufficient protection from inclement elements for the health and well being of the animal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1898, ch. 548, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-2

; P.L. 1981, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 351, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 458, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 200, § 1.

4-1-3.
Unnecessary cruelty.

Every owner, possessor, or person having the charge or custody of any animal, who cruelly drives or works that animal when unfit for labor, or cruelly abandons that animal, or who carries that animal or who fails to provide that animal with adequate living conditions as defined in §

4-1-1

, or who engages in the hazardous accumulation of animals as defined in §

4-1-1

, or causes that animal, to be carried, in or upon any vehicle or otherwise, in a cruel or inhuman manner; or willfully, intentionally, maliciously, recklessly, and/or knowingly authorizes or permits that animal to be subjected to unnecessary torture, suffering, or cruelty of any kind; or who places, or causes to have placed, on any animal any substance that may produce irritation or pain or that is declared a hazardous substance by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration or by the state department of health, shall be punished for each offense in the manner provided in §

4-1-2

. If the offense described in this section results in the death of the animal, the person shall be punished in the manner provided in §

4-1-5

. If any owner, possessor, or person having the charge or custody of any animal is found guilty of or pleads nolo contendere to a violation of this section and said violation involves the hazardous accumulation of animals, the court shall, in imposing a penalty under this section, take into account whether the defendant’s conduct could be considered to be the result of a mental health disorder as defined in §

27-38.2-2

.

The substances proscribed by subsection (a) do not include any drug having curative and therapeutic effect for disease in animals and that is prepared and intended for veterinary use.

University, college, or hospital research facilities licensed and/or inspected by the U.S. Department of Agriculture or the U.S. Public Health Service of the Department of Health and Human Services shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection (a) provided that they are in good standing with the federal agency responsible for licensing or assurance of the facility.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-3

; P.L. 1973, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 455, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 458, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 444, § 1.

4-1-3.1.
Prohibited practices in destruction of animals.

It is unlawful for any veterinarian or owner, as defined in §

4-1-1

, or any agent of a veterinarian or owner, or any other person to destroy any animal by the use of a high altitude decompression chamber. When carbon monoxide is used as a euthanizing agent, only one animal is placed in the chamber. Violation of this section is punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 164, § 1.

4-1-3.2.
Animal confinement in motor vehicles prohibited.

No owner or person shall confine any animal in a motor vehicle that is done in a manner that places the animal in a life-threatening or extreme health-threatening situation by exposing it to a prolonged period of extreme heat or cold without proper ventilation or other protection from such heat or cold. In order to protect the health and safety of an animal, an animal control officer, law enforcement officer, or fire fighter who has probable cause to believe that this section is being violated shall have the authority to enter such motor vehicle by any reasonable means necessary under the circumstances after making a reasonable effort to locate the owner or other responsible person.

A law enforcement or animal control officer may take all steps that are reasonably necessary to remove an animal from a motor vehicle if the animal’s health, safety, or well-being appears to be in immediate danger from heat, cold, or lack of adequate ventilation and the conditions could reasonably be expected to cause extreme suffering or death.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a law enforcement officer or animal control officer from removing an animal from a motor vehicle if the animal’s safety appears to be in immediate danger from heat, cold, lack of adequate ventilation, lack of food or water or other circumstances that could reasonably be expected to cause suffering, disability, or death to the animal. A law enforcement officer or animal control officer may enter the motor vehicle for the sole purpose of rescue or release of the animal and may not search the vehicle unless otherwise permitted by law.

A law enforcement or animal control officer who removes an animal in accordance with this section shall, in a secure and conspicuous location on or within the motor vehicle, leave written notice bearing the officer’s or agent’s name and office and the address of the location where the animal may be retrieved. The owner may retrieve the animal only after payment of all charges that have accrued for the maintenance, care, medical treatment, and impoundment of the animal.

A law enforcement or animal control officer who removes an animal from a motor vehicle pursuant to this section is immune from criminal or civil liability that might otherwise result from the removal.

Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be punished by imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year or by a fine of no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 320, § 1.

4-1-4.
Abandonment of infirm animals.

If any maimed, sick, infirm, or disabled animal is abandoned to die, by any owner or person having charge of that animal, that person shall, for each offense, be punished in the manner provided in §

4-1-2

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-4

.

4-1-5.
Malicious injury to or killing of animals.

Every person who cuts out the tongue or otherwise dismembers any animal maliciously; or maliciously kills or wounds any animal; or maliciously administers poison to or exposes any poisonous substance with intent that the poison shall be taken or swallowed by any animal; or who maliciously exposes poisoned meat with intent that the poison meat is taken or swallowed by any wild animal, shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), and shall, in the case of any animal of another, be liable to the owner of this animal for triple damages, to be recovered by civil action. In addition, any person convicted under this section is required to serve fifty (50) hours of community restitution. The community restitution penalty shall not be suspended or deferred and is mandatory.

This section shall not apply to licensed hunters during hunting season or a licensed business killing animals for human consumption.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 22; P.L. 1913, ch. 919, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-5

; P.L. 1979, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 656, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 457, § 1.

4-1-6.
Shearing of horses in winter.

No person shall cut, clip, or shear the hair or coating of any horse between October 15th and March 1st unless the necessity for the cutting, clipping, or shearing has been certified in writing and filed with the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals by a licensed graduate veterinarian. Any person violating this section shall, for each offense, be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) days or be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 22; P.L. 1945, ch. 1651, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-6

.

4-1-6.1.
Operating upon tails of bovines prohibited.

Any person who intentionally cuts or alters the bone, tissues, muscles or tendons of the tail of any bovine or otherwise operates upon it in any manner for the purpose or with the effect of docking, setting, or otherwise altering the natural carriage of the tail, or who knowingly permits the same to be done upon the premises of which he or she is the owner, lessee, proprietor or user, or who assists in or is voluntarily present at such cutting or alteration, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both. If any bovine is found with the bone, tissues, muscles or tendons of its tail cut or altered as aforesaid upon the premises or in the charge and custody of any person, and the wound resulting therefrom is unhealed, such fact may be evidence of a violation of this section by the owner or user of such premises, or the person having such charge or custody.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to tail docking performed by a veterinarian for veterinary purposes, provided that the procedure is performed under the following conditions:

The animal has been adequately anesthetized to minimize the animal’s pain and suffering during the treatment or operation.

The procedure is done in a way that minimizes the long-term pain and suffering resulting from the procedure.

The veterinarian uses suitable instruments.

The procedure is done under hygienic conditions.

The owner of any bovine with a docked tail who purchased the bovine in a state where tail docking is legal shall be exempt from prosecution under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 353, § 1.

4-1-7.
Live poultry containers.

Any crate or other container used for the purpose of transporting, shipping, or holding for sale any live poultry shall be in a sanitary condition and shall be constructed so as to provide sufficient ventilation and warmth and the poultry, while in that container, shall receive any reasonable care as may be required to prevent unnecessary suffering. Any person violating any provision of this section shall, for each offense, be imprisoned not exceeding fifteen (15) days or be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1945, ch. 640, § 23; P.L. 1945, ch. 1651, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-7

.

4-1-8.
Sale of chicks and ducklings — Dyeing prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person to dye a chick, duckling, or other live poultry, or to have in his or her possession any chick, duckling, or other live poultry which has been dyed. No person shall sell or offer for sale any live chicks or ducklings under two (2) months of age in quantities of less than twelve (12), and provided further, that no person, firm, corporation or association shall offer live chicks or ducklings under two (2) months of age as a bonus, or as an inducement to the sale of or in conjunction with the purchase of any article. Any person, firm, or corporation violating this section shall for each offense be punished in the manner provided in §

4-1-2

. No pet store shall sell chicks or ducklings in any quantity.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 24; P.L. 1945, ch. 1651, § 2; P.L. 1964, ch. 24, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-8

; P.L. 1968, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 308, § 1.

4-1-9.
Animal fighting.

Any person who causes or encourages the fighting of any bird, dog, or animal with any other bird, dog, or animal, or keeps or maintains any place for the fighting of birds, dogs, or animals, or who knowingly permits, or suffers, any fight to be had on his or her premises or on premises under his or her control, or makes any bet or lays any wager of any kind upon the result of that fight, shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years, or both, for the first offense, and for any subsequent offense shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 15; P.L. 1901, ch. 848, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-9

; P.L. 1980, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 126, § 1.

4-1-10.
Possession or training of fighting animals.

Whoever owns, possesses, keeps or trains any bird, dog, or other animal, with the intent that that bird, dog, or animal engages in an exhibition of fighting, shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) and/or be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years for the first offense, and for any subsequent offense shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-10

; P.L. 1980, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 126, § 1.

4-1-11.
Attendance at bird or animal fight.

Whoever is present at any place, building, or tenement where preparations are being made for an exhibition of the fighting of birds or animals, with the intent being present at that exhibition, or is present at that exhibition, shall be fined not exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or imprisoned for not more than two (2) years, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-11

; P.L. 1975, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 176, § 1.

4-1-12.
Entry of premises where bird or animal fights are conducted — Arrest — Seizure of birds or animals.

Any deputy sheriff, town sergeant, town constable, police officer, or any officer authorized to serve criminal process may enter any place, building, or tenement anywhere within the state where there is an exhibition of the fighting of birds or animals, or where preparations are being made for that exhibition, and, without a warrant, arrest all persons present and take possession of the birds or animals engaged in fighting and all birds or animals found there and intended to be used or engaged in fighting. Those persons shall be kept in custody in jail or other convenient place not more than twenty-four (24) hours, Sundays and legal holidays excepted, at or before the expiration of which time those persons shall be brought before a district court or the superior court and proceeded against according to law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 11; P.L. 1898, ch. 548, § 3; P.L. 1900, ch. 747, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-12

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 2.

4-1-13.
Forfeiture of fighting birds or animals.

After the seizure of any birds or animals as provided in §

4-1-12

, application shall be made to a district court or the superior court for a sentence of forfeiture of the birds or animals; and if, upon the hearing of the application, it is found that the birds or animals, at the time of their seizure, were engaged in fighting at an exhibition or were owned, possessed, or kept by any person with the intent that they should be engaged in fighting at an exhibition, sentence of forfeiture shall be pronounced against them. Any officer authorized to serve criminal process shall sell them in any manner that the court orders, and pay the proceeds of that sale, after the payment of costs, including costs of seizure and keeping of those birds or animals, to the general treasurer for the use of the state. Whenever a seizure and application for sentence of forfeiture is made by or results from the complaint or information of any officer or agent of the society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, the proceeds of that sale shall be paid over to the society. Should it be found that any seized birds or animals are of no use or value, they shall be set at large, or otherwise disposed of, as the court may direct. The claimant is allowed to appear in the proceedings upon any application for a sentence of forfeiture. All seized birds or animals not sentenced for forfeiture shall be delivered to the owner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 12; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-13

.

4-1-14.
Appeal of sentence of forfeiture.

Any claimant aggrieved by a sentence of forfeiture of a district court may, before the execution of that sentence, appeal to the superior court in the manner provided with reference to criminal appeals from district courts.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 13; C.P.A. 1905, § 1122; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-14

.

4-1-15.
Expense of care of seized birds or animals.

The necessary expenses incurred in the care and disposing of seized birds or animals may be allowed and paid in the same manner that costs in criminal prosecutions are paid.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-15

.

4-1-16.
Use of birds as targets.

Any person who keeps or uses any live pigeon, fowl, or other bird for the purpose of a target or to be shot at, either for amusement or as a test of skill in marksmanship, and any person who shoots at any bird or is a party to any shooting of any fowl or bird and any person who rents any building, shed, room, yard, field, or premises, or knowingly suffers or permits the use of any building, shed, room, yard, field, or premises, for the purpose of shooting any fowl or bird, shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) or be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) days, or both. Nothing in this section applies to the shooting of any wild game in its wild state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-16

.

4-1-17.
Unloading of animals in transit for rest, water, and feeding.

No railroad company, in the transportation of animals, shall permit those animals to be confined in cars, after they have been confined twenty-eight (28) consecutive hours, without unloading those animals for rest, water, and feeding for at least five (5) consecutive hours, unless prevented from unloading them by storm or accidental causes. In estimating the confinement, the time during which the animals have been confined without rest on connecting roads from which they are received shall be included. It is the intent of this section to prohibit their continuous confinement longer than twenty-eight (28) hours, except upon the stated contingencies.

Animals unloaded shall be properly fed, watered, and sheltered, during their rest, by the owner or person having the custody of the animals; or in case of his or her default in doing so, then by the railroad company transporting those animals, at the expense of the owner or person in custody of the animals, and the company shall in that case have a lien upon those animals for food, care, and custody furnished and shall not be liable for any detention of those animals authorized by this chapter.

Any company, owner, or custodian of animals in transit failing to comply with this section shall for each offense be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Whenever animals are carried in cars in which they can and do have proper food, water, space and opportunity for rest, the provisions for unloading them shall not apply.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-17

.

4-1-18.
Arrest of violators without warrant — Care of animals.

Any person violating this chapter may be arrested on view and held without a warrant; provided, that an arrest or detention without warrant shall not continue longer than twenty-four (24) hours; and the person making an arrest, with or without a warrant, shall use reasonable diligence to give notice to the owner of animals found in the charge or custody of the person arrested, and shall properly care and provide for those animals until the owner shall take charge of them, provided the owner shall do so within thirty (30) days from the date of the notice. The person making an arrest shall have a lien on those animals for the expense of their care and provision.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 5; P.L. 1898, ch. 548, § 2; P.L. 1900, ch. 747, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-18

.

4-1-19.
Issuance of search warrants.

Whenever complaint is made on oath to any magistrate authorized to issue warrants in criminal cases, that the complainant believes and has reasonable cause to believe that the laws in relation to cruelty to animals have been or are being violated in any building or place, the magistrate, if satisfied that there is reasonable cause for that belief, shall issue a search warrant, authorizing any officer, competent to serve a warrant, to search the building or place; but no search shall be made after sunset, unless specially authorized by the magistrate upon satisfactory cause shown.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-19

.

4-1-20.
Duty of police officers — Fines paid to society for prevention of cruelty to animals.

Any deputy sheriff, town constable, or police officer shall prosecute all violations of this chapter that come to his or her knowledge and all fines and forfeitures resulting from the complaint of any officer or agent of the Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals under this chapter, shall enure and be paid over to the society in aid of the benevolent objects for which it was incorporated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 8; G.L., ch. 283, § 15, as enacted by P.L. 1901, ch. 848, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 8; ch. 349, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 8; ch. 401, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 19; ch. 640, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-20

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 2.

4-1-21.
Powers of agents of society for prevention of cruelty to animals.

The general agent of the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals and any number of special agents as may be appointed by that society have the same power and authority to arrest as any officer authorized to serve criminal process for the purpose of enforcing any of the laws of this state in relation to cruelty to animals, that power and authority to extend throughout the state, and they may serve any search warrant issued under §

4-1-19

and may search any building or place named in that warrant. A general agent and any special agents may, for the purpose of carrying out their duties, possess and carry pistols as defined in §

11-47-2

, and the provisions of §

11-47-8

shall not apply to them. Any person who interferes with or obstructs any of those agents in the discharge of their duty shall be guilty of obstructing an officer and punished as provided in §

11-32-1

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 114, § 19; P.L. 1907, ch. 1446, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 18; P.L. 1945, ch. 1651, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-21

; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 1.

4-1-22.
Care of neglected animals by society — Forfeiture of owner’s rights — Expenses.

An officer or agent of the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals may lawfully take charge of and shall provide adequate care to any animal found abandoned or neglected or hazardously accumulated as defined in §

4-1-1

, or that in the opinion of that officer or agent, is aged, maimed, disabled, lame, sick, diseased, injured, unfit for the labor it is performing, or cruelly treated, and shall give notice to the owner or guardian, if known.

Every owner or guardian, upon conviction, plea of guilty, or plea of nolo contendere, of abandonment, neglect, hazardous accumulation as defined in §

4-1-1

, or otherwise cruel treatment of any animal taken charge of by the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals under this section, forfeits the rights to ownership or control of that animal to the Society for disposition in any manner deemed suitable for that animal.

Whenever any officer or agent of the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals lawfully takes charge of any animal under this section, all reasonable expenses for the care and treatment of the animal(s), while in the custody of the Society during this time, shall be paid for by the owner or guardian. The Society has the authority to commence a civil action for damages against the owner or guardian thirty (30) days after a written demand for payment of the expense of the suitable care of that animal has been sent and no payment has been received. The written demand shall state that the failure to pay or make arrangements to pay for the care of that animal may result in forfeiture of ownership of the animal. The cost of the care and treatment that is billed to the owner or guardian shall be reasonable and related to equivalent services provided by veterinary care and animal sheltering, feeding, and boarding services in this state.

The owner or guardian of any animal that is in the charge of the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals pursuant to the authority granted in this section may, within sixty (60) days following the date that the society gives notice of the taking of possession of the animal, petition the district court for an order to return custody of the animal to the owner or guardian.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause a summons to be issued requiring an authorized representative of the Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals to appear in court at the time and place named, which summons shall be served not less than fourteen (14) days before the date of the hearing.

At the hearing on the petition, the court shall consider:

The animal’s condition;

The care required to maintain the animal safely and in an appropriate environment; and

The ability of the petitioner to provide or arrange for the adequate care of the animal, including during the time any criminal charges related to or arising from the seizure are pending.

If, after hearing, the court finds that the owner or guardian of the animal has the ability to properly care for or arrange for the adequate care of the animal during the pendency of the criminal charges, the court may allow the owner or guardian of the animal to have or arrange for the adequate care, custody, and control of the animal pending the final determination of the related criminal charges subject to such restrictions and conditions as the court determines to be reasonable or necessary.

All issues will be decided upon a preponderance of the evidence.

In the event that the court orders an animal returned to the owner or guardian following the hearing, the owner or guardian will not be required to pay for the cost of care incurred prior to the date of the hearing unless and until such time as there has been a conviction, plea of guilty, or plea of nolo contendere, of abandonment, neglect, hazardous accumulation as defined in §

4-1-1

, or otherwise cruel treatment in the related criminal proceeding.

In the event that the owner or guardian fails to petition for custody of the animal within sixty (60) days of notice of the taking or fails to pay within sixty (60) days of the written demand for payment, the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals may petition the court for transfer of ownership of the animal to the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals. If the owner or guardian fails to respond to the petition for transfer of ownership the court shall transfer ownership to the society.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 4; P.L. 1945, ch. 1651, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-22

; P.L. 1981, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 431, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 432, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

4-1-23.
Destruction of infirm animals by society.

If, upon examination by a licensed graduate veterinarian of any animal taken possession of under §

4-1-22

, the veterinarian certifies, in writing, to the society that the animal is so aged, maimed, disabled, lame, sick, diseased, or injured as to be unfit for any useful purpose, any officer or agent of the society may lawfully and humanely destroy that animal or cause it to be humanely destroyed, and the society, its officers and agents, are exonerated from all liability to the owner of that animal on account of its destruction.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 640, § 4; P.L. 1945, ch. 1651, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-23

.

4-1-24.
Jurisdiction of offenses — Appeals.

The district court has concurrent jurisdiction with the superior court, over all offenses under this chapter and to the full extent of the penalties specified. Parties defendant, however, have the same right to appeal from the sentence of a district court as is now provided by law in other criminal cases.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 9; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-24

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 53.

4-1-25.
Appropriations for prevention of cruelty — Payments to society.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum it deems necessary, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, to be expended under the direction of the director of environmental management, for the purpose of preventing cruelty to animals, and the director may pay that sum to the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals for that purpose, and the state controller is authorized to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of any sum appropriated, or so much of the sum as may be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 114, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 138, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 19; P.L. 1923, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1374, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 640, § 19; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

4-1-25

.

4-1-26.
Abandonment of animals.

If any person having possession and/or control of an animal abandons that animal on a street, road, highway or in a public place or on private property or from a motor vehicle, or in a dwelling or any other building or structure without providing for the care of that animal, he or she shall be punished in the manner provided in §

4-1-2

for each such offense. If this abandonment results in the death of the animal, the person shall be punished in the manner provided in §

4-1-5

. Abandonment means the relinquishment of all right, title, claim, or possession of the animal with the intention of not reclaiming it or resuming its ownership or possession.

Any pound or animal shelter as defined under §

4-19-2

, shall deem abandoned any animal impounded and not redeemed by its owner within ten (10) days of impoundment if such animal is wearing identification. Any animal impounded and not wearing identification shall be deemed abandoned if not redeemed by its owner within five (5) days of impoundment. Any animal deemed abandoned shall become the property of the impounding agency and may be adopted.

Any pound or animal shelter shall make a prompt and reasonable attempt to locate and notify the owner of the impounded animal, including scanning the animal for a microchip.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 337, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 358, § 1.

4-1-26.1.
Reports of abandoned, neglected or abused animals.

Any Rhode Island licensed veterinarian, veterinarian technician, animal shelter, animal kennel, or other person entrusted with the care or custody of an animal shall report to any police department (local or state), animal control officials, or officers of private organizations devoted to the humane treatment of animals, the condition of any animal that the parties entrusted with care or custody of an animal knows, or reasonably believes, to be abandoned, as defined in §

4-1-26

, neglected, or abused, and shall be immune from suit pursuant to the provisions of §

4-1-37

. Any party who fails to report pursuant to this section shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose a duty to further investigate observed or reasonably suspected animal abandonment, cruel neglect, or abuse.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 172, § 2.

4-1-27.
Auction of lost or abandoned animals and poultry.

The general agent of the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, within his or her discretion, may sell at public auction any lost or abandoned animals and poultry. Before proceeding to sale, the general agent shall give notice to the owners of the lost or abandoned animals by advertising once a week for three (3) successive weeks prior to the sale in some daily newspaper printed in English and published in this state.

The agent is not liable in any legal action brought against him or her based on the sale. The proceeds of the sales shall be turned over to the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals to be used to defray the cost of shelter and care of animals which are the subject of the sale and to cover any costs incident to the sale.

Any remaining proceeds from the sale shall be held for a period of two (2) years by the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals for the account of the rightful owner, who, upon making a claim and showing satisfactory evidence of ownership, shall be entitled to those proceeds. If unclaimed within that two (2) year period, the proceeds shall then become the property of the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals to be used for any and all purposes of the society.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 72, § 1.